Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7-422 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any person who engages in the on-farm sale of donkey milk may
advertise such donkey milk.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 7-414, is
amended to read as follows:
HB1191 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Section 7-414. A. The provisions of the Oklahoma Milk and Milk
Products Act shall not be construed to:
1. Include incidental sales of raw milk directly to consumers
at the farm where the milk is produced;
2. Preclude the advertising of the incidental sale of goat milk
or donkey milk; and
3. Prohibit any farmer or producer from making cheese using
milk or cream produced on the farm of such farmer or producer.
B. For purposes of this section, incidental sales of goat milk
or donkey milk are those sales where the average monthly number of
gallons sold does not exceed one hundred (100).
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended.










HB1191 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.